Tennessee, session 114, HB2324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-2122, is amended by adding
the following as new subsections:
(e) Notwithstanding § 67-1-1702, subdivision (a)(4) or (8), or another law to the
contrary:
(1) A refund paid pursuant to this section is open to public inspection as
a public record under the public records laws compiled in title 10, chapter 7.
Upon written request to the department, a copy of a record, document, or other
information, including the name of the taxpayer and total amount refunded,
pertaining to a refund paid pursuant to this section must be forwarded to the
requesting party.
(2)
(A) The comptroller of the treasury shall conduct or contract for at
least one (1) annual financial audit of all franchise tax refunds claimed
and all such tax refunds issued to taxpayers for the prior fiscal year under
the authority granted in § 8-4-109. The audit must include any other
information the comptroller deems relevant in making such
determinations.
HB2324
011930
- 1 -

(B) All audits conducted under subdivision (e)(2)(A) must be
made available on the comptroller's website no later than December 31 of
the subsequent fiscal year.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-1-1709(d), is amended by
deleting "§ 67-4-2122(a)(8)" and substituting instead the language "§ 67-4-2122(a)(8) or (e)".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011930